sv: Skyltdocka-stil: Uppblåsbar; Mesh-popup; Metallram; Solid PVC; Ärmfäste; Annat
de: Stil der Schaufensterpuppe: Aufblasbar; Mesh-Pop-up; Metallrahmen; PVC massiv; Ärmelbefestigung; Sonstige
cs: Manekýnský styl: Nafukovací; Vyskakovací (síťovaná); Kovový rám; Pevné PVC; Rukávový nástavec; Jiné
zh-TW: 人體模型款式: 充氣式; 網眼快閃式; 金屬框架; 實心 PVC; 袖子配件; 其他
nl: Mannequin stijl: Opblaasbaar; Mesh pop-up; Metalen frame; Massief PVC; Mouwbevestiging; Anders
ro-RO: Stil manechin: Gonflabil; Pop-up din plasă; Cadru metalic; PVC solid; Atașare la mânecă; Altele
bg-BG: Стил на манекен: Надуваем; Мрежест pop-up; Метална рамка; Твърдо PVC; Приставка за ръкав; Друго
en: Mannequin style: Inflatable; Mesh pop-up; Metal frame; PVC solid; Sleeve attachment; Other
da: Mannequin-stil: Oppustelig; Pop op-netstof; Metalramme; Massiv PVC; Ærmemontering; Andet
pt-PT: Estilo do manequim: Insuflável; Malha pop-up; Estrutura metálica; PVC maciço; Acessório de manga; Outro
fi: Harjoittelunuken tyyli: Puhallettava; Verkko, pop-up; Metallirunko; Kiinteä PVC; Hihaosa; Muu
th: สไตล์หุ่นจำลอง: เป่าลม; ตาข่ายป๊อปอัพ; โครงเหล็ก; PVC แบบตัน; ที่สวมแขนเสื้อ; อื่นๆ
ja: マネキンスタイル: インフレータブル; メッシュポップアップ; メタルフレーム; PVCソリッド; スリーブアタッチメント; その他
sl-SI: Stil lutke: Napihljiv; Mrežast zložljiv; Kovinski okvir; Trden PVC; Nastavek za rokav; Drugo
pl: Styl manekina: Dmuchany; Siatkowy pop-up; Metalowy stelaż; Twarde PVC; Z dopinanymi rękawami; Inne
zh-CN: 人体模型风格: 充气式; 网眼弹框式; 金属框架; 坚固 PVC; 袖套附件; 其他
el: Στυλ ανδρείκελου: Φουσκωτό; Πλέγμα pop-up; Μεταλλικός σκελετός; Συμπαγές PVC; Εξάρτημα μανικιού; Άλλο
nb: Mannekengens stil: Oppblåsbar; Pop-up-netting; Metallramme; Massiv PVC; Ermefeste; Annet
it: Stile del manichino: Gonfiabile; Pop-up in rete; Telaio in metallo; PVC solido; Attacco a manica; Altro
hu: Edzőbábú stílusa: Felfújható; Hálós pop-up; Fémvázas; Tömör PVC; Ráilleszthető; Egyéb
vi: Phong cách ma-nơ-canh: Bơm hơi; Lưới bung; Khung kim loại; Nhựa PVC đặc; Kèm ống tay áo; Khác
fr: Type de mannequin: Gonflable; Pop-up en maille; Cadre en métal; PVC rigide; Attache de manche; Autre
ru: Стиль манекена: Надувной; Сетчатый складной; Металлический каркас; Из цельного ПВХ; Насадка для рукавов; Другое
es: Tipo de maniquí: Inflable; Malla desplegable; Estructura de metal; PVC sólido; Accesorio de manga; Otro
hr-HR: Stil lutke: Na napuhavanje; Mrežasti pop-up; Metalni okvir; Tvrdi PVC; Nastavak za rukav; Ostalo
sk-SK: Štýl figuríny: Nafukovací; Sieťovaný pop-up; Kovový rám; Pevné PVC; S rukávovým nástavcom; Iný
tr: Manken tasarım tipi: Şişirilebilir; Açılır kapanır file; Metal iskelet; Sert PVC; Kol eklentisi; Diğer
pt-BR: Manequim estilo: Inflável; Malha pop-up; Estrutura de metal; PVC sólido; Fixação na manga; Outro
lt-LT: Manekeno stilius: Pripučiamas; Išskleidžiamas tinklinis; Metalinis rėmas; Vientisas PVC; Rankovių priedas; Kita
ko: 마네킹 스타일: 공기 주입식; 메시 팝업형; 금속 프레임; PVC 솔리드; 슬리브 부착형; 기타